Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 2 Petition for Appointed Conservator

29-5-10.
Petition for appointment of conservator; requirements of petition.

Any interested person, including the proposed ward, may file a petition for the appointment of a conservator. Such petition shall be filed in the court of the county in which:

The proposed ward is domiciled;

The proposed ward is found; provided, however, that if the court of the county where the proposed ward is found determines that the proposed ward was removed to such county solely for the purposes of filing a petition for the appointment of a conservator and that such court acquired jurisdiction to appoint a conservator because of unjustifiable conduct, such court may take any action authorized by Code Section 29-11-16; or

Jurisdiction is otherwise proper under Code Section 29-11-12.

The petition for appointment of a conservator shall set forth:

A statement of the facts upon which the court’s jurisdiction is based;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the proposed ward, if known;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the petitioner or petitioners and the petitioner’s relationship to the proposed ward, if any, and, if different from the petitioner, the name, address, and county of domicile of the person nominated by the petitioner to serve as conservator and that person’s relationship to the proposed ward, if any;

A statement of the reasons the conservatorship is sought, including the facts which support the claim of the need for a conservator;

Any foreseeable limitations on the conservatorship;

Whether, to the petitioner’s knowledge, there exists any power of attorney, trust, or other instrument that deals with the management of the property of the proposed ward in the event of incapacity and the name and address of any fiduciary or agent named in the instrument;

A description of all known assets, income, other sources of funds, liabilities, and expenses of the proposed ward;

The names and addresses of the following whose whereabouts are known:

The spouse of the proposed ward; and

All children of the proposed ward; or

If there are no adult children, then at least two adults in the following order of priority:

Lineal descendants of the proposed ward;

Parents and siblings of the proposed ward; and

Friends of the proposed ward;

If known, the name and address of any person nominated to serve as conservator by the proposed ward, as described in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-3;

If known, the name and address of any person nominated to serve as conservator by the proposed ward’s spouse, adult child, or parent, as described in paragraphs (2) through (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-3;

The name and address of any person nominated to serve as conservator by the petitioner;

Whether any nominated conservator has consented or will consent to serve as conservator;

If known, whether any nominated conservator is an owner, operator, or employee of a long-term care or other caregiving institution or facility at which the proposed ward is receiving care, and, if so, whether the nominated conservator is related to the proposed ward by blood, marriage, or adoption;

Whether an emergency conservator has been appointed for the proposed ward or a petition for the appointment of an emergency conservator has been filed or is being filed;

If known, a disclosure of any ownership or other financial interest that would cause any nominated conservator to have a conflict of interest with the proposed ward;

A specific listing of any additional powers, as described in subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 29-5-23, that are requested by the conservator and a statement of the circumstances which would justify the granting of additional powers;

Whether a guardian or conservator has been appointed in another state or whether a petition for the appointment of a guardian or conservator is pending in another state;

That to petitioner’s knowledge, there has been no petition for conservatorship denied or dismissed within two years by any court of this state or, if so, that there has been a significant change in the condition or circumstances of the individual, as shown by the accompanying affidavits or evaluation;

Any state in which the proposed ward was physically present, including any period of temporary absence, for at least six consecutive months immediately before the filing of the petition or ending within the six months prior to the filing of the petition; and

The reason for any omission in the petition for appointment of conservator in the event full particulars are lacking.

The petition shall be sworn to by two or more petitioners or shall be supported by an affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker authorized to practice in that facility.

Any affidavit shall be based on personal knowledge and shall state that the affiant has examined the proposed ward within 15 days prior to the filing of the petition and that, based upon the examination, the proposed ward was determined to lack sufficient capacity to make or communicate significant, responsible decisions concerning the management of the proposed ward’s property.

In addition to stating the facts that support the claim of the need for a conservator, the affidavit shall state the foreseeable duration of the conservatorship and may set forth the affiant’s opinion as to any other limitations on the conservatorship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 884, § 2/HB 446; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 14/HB 70; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 29/HB 1428.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “Any interested person or persons, including the proposed ward, may file a petition for the appointment of a conservator. The petition shall be filed in the court of the county in which the proposed ward is domiciled or is found, provided that the court of the county where the proposed ward is found shall not have jurisdiction to hear any conservatorship petition if it appears that the proposed ward was removed to that county solely for the purposes of filing a petition for the appointment of a conservator.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation at the end of paragraph (b)(13).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (2012).

29-5-11.
Prerequisite finding prior to appointment of conservator; notice; evaluation; written report.

Upon the filing of a petition for conservatorship of the estate of a proposed ward, the court shall review the petition and the affidavit, if any, and determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of a conservator within the meaning of Code Section 29-5-1.

If the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of a conservator, the court shall dismiss the petition and provide the proposed ward with a copy of the petition, the affidavit, if any, and the order dismissing the petition.

If the court determines that there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of a conservator:

The court shall immediately notify the proposed ward of the proceedings by service of all pleadings on the proposed ward, which notice shall:

Be served personally on the proposed ward by an officer of the court and shall not be served by mail;

Inform the proposed ward that a petition has been filed to have a conservator appointed for the proposed ward, that the proposed ward has the right to attend any hearing that is held, and that if a conservator is appointed the proposed ward may lose important rights to control the management of the proposed ward’s property;

Inform the proposed ward of the place and time at which the proposed ward shall submit to the evaluation provided for by subsection (d) of this Code section; and

Inform the proposed ward of the proposed ward’s right to independent legal counsel and that the court shall appoint counsel within two days of service unless the proposed ward indicates that he or she has retained counsel within that time frame;

Upon notice that the proposed ward has retained legal counsel or upon the appointment of legal counsel by the court, the court shall furnish legal counsel with a copy of the petition, the affidavit, if any, and the order for evaluation provided for by subsection (d) of this Code section.

The court shall give notice of the petition by first-class mail to all adult individuals and other persons who are named in the petition pursuant to the requirements of paragraphs (8) through (10) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-10; and

Upon the court’s own motion or upon the motion of any interested person, the court shall determine whether to appoint a guardian ad litem.

If the petition is not dismissed pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the court shall appoint an evaluating physician who shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker authorized to practice in that federal facility other than the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker who completed the affidavit attached to the petition pursuant to subsection (c) of Code Section 29-5-10.

When evaluating the proposed ward, the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker shall explain the purpose of the evaluation to the proposed ward. The proposed ward may remain silent. Any statements made by the proposed ward during the evaluation shall be privileged and shall be inadmissable as evidence in any proceeding other than a proceeding under this chapter. The proposed ward’s legal counsel shall have the right to be present but shall not participate in the evaluation.

The evaluation shall be conducted with as little interference with the proposed ward’s activities as possible. The evaluation shall take place at the place and time set in the notice to the proposed ward and to his or her legal counsel and the time set shall not be sooner than the fifth day after the service of notice on the proposed ward. The court, however, shall have the exclusive power to change the place and time of the examination at any time upon reasonable notice being given to the proposed ward and to his or her legal counsel. If the proposed ward fails to appear, the court may order that the proposed ward be taken directly to and from a medical facility, office of a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker for purposes of evaluation only. The evaluation shall be conducted during the normal business hours of the facility or office and the proposed ward shall not be detained in the facility or office overnight. The evaluation may include, but not be limited to:

A self-report from the proposed ward, if possible;

Questions and observations of the proposed ward to assess the functional abilities of the proposed ward;

A review of the records for the proposed ward including, but not limited to, medical records, medication charts, and other available records;

An assessment of cultural factors and language barriers that may impact the proposed ward’s abilities and living environment; and

All other factors the evaluator determines to be appropriate to the evaluation.

A written report shall be filed with the court no later than seven days after the evaluation and the court shall serve a copy of the report by first-class mail upon the proposed ward and the proposed ward’s legal counsel and guardian ad litem, if appointed.

The report shall be signed under oath by the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker and shall:

State the circumstances and duration of the evaluation, including a summary of questions or tests utilized, and the elements of the evaluation;

List all persons and other sources of information consulted in evaluating the proposed ward;

Describe the proposed ward’s mental and physical state and condition, including all observed facts considered by the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker;

Describe the overall social condition of the proposed ward, including support, care, education, and well-being; and

Describe the needs of the proposed ward and their foreseeable duration.

The proposed ward’s legal counsel may file a written response to the evaluation, provided the response is filed no later than the date of the commencement of the hearing on the petition for conservatorship. The response may include, but is not limited to, independent evaluations, affidavits of individuals with personal knowledge of the proposed ward, and a statement of applicable law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (2012).

29-5-12.
Judicial review and proceedings.

After the filing of the evaluation report, the court shall review the pleadings and the evaluation report.

If, after the review, the court finds that there is no probable cause to support a finding that the proposed ward is in need of a conservator within the meaning of Code Section 29-5-1, the court shall dismiss the petition.

If, after the review, the court finds that there is probable cause to support a finding that the proposed ward is in need of a conservator, the court shall schedule a hearing on the petition. Notice of the hearing shall be served by first-class mail upon the proposed ward, the proposed ward’s legal counsel, and the proposed ward’s guardian ad litem, if any; the petitioner or the petitioner’s legal counsel, if any; and all adult individuals and other persons who are named in the petition pursuant to the requirements of paragraphs (8) through (10) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-10. The date of the hearing shall not be less than ten days after the date the notice is mailed.

The hearing shall be held in a courtroom or, for good cause shown, at any other place as the court may set. At the request of the proposed ward or the proposed ward’s legal counsel and for good cause shown, the court may exercise its discretion to exclude the public from the hearing and the record shall reflect the court’s action. The proposed ward or the proposed ward’s legal counsel may waive the appearance of the proposed ward at the hearing.

The hearing shall be recorded by either a certified court reporter or a sound-recording device. The recording shall be retained for not less than 45 days from the date of the entry of the order described in Code Section 29-5-138.

The court shall apply the rules of evidence applicable in civil cases.

The court shall utilize the criteria in Code Section 29-5-1 to determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence of the need for a conservatorship in light of the evidence taken at the hearing. In addition to the evidence at the hearing, the court may consider the evaluation report and any response filed by the proposed ward. The burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner.

Upon determination of the need for a conservatorship, the court shall determine the powers, if any, which are to be retained by the proposed ward, in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-5-21 and whether any additional powers shall be granted to the conservator pursuant to the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 29-5-23.

If the court determines that a conservatorship is necessary and the proposed ward is present, the proposed ward may suggest any person as conservator. The court shall select as conservator the person who shall serve the best interest of the ward.

In any procedure under this chapter in which the judge of the court is unable to hear a case within the time required for a hearing on the petition for conservatorship, the judge shall appoint an individual to serve to hear the case and exercise all the jurisdiction of the court in the case. Any individual so appointed shall be a member of the State Bar of Georgia who is qualified to serve as the probate judge in that county and who is, in the opinion of the appointing judge, qualified for the duties by training and experience. The appointment may be made on a case-by-case basis or by making a standing appointment of one or more individuals. Any individual who receives a standing appointment shall serve at the pleasure of the judge who makes the appointment or the judge’s successor in office. The compensation of an individual so appointed shall be as agreed upon by the judge who makes the appointment and the individual appointed, with the approval of the governing authority of the county for which the individual is appointed, and shall be paid from county funds. All fees collected for the service of the appointed individual shall be paid into the general funds of the county.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

29-5-13.
Requirements of order granting conservatorship; service; obligation of legal counsel; filing of certificate of conservatorship with court.

The court shall issue an order that sets forth the findings of fact and conclusions of law that support the grant or denial of the petition. An order granting conservatorship shall specify:

The name of the conservator and the basis for the selection;

Any powers retained by the ward pursuant to Code Section 29-5-21;

The limitations on the conservatorship;

A specific listing of any additional powers which are granted to the conservator as set forth in subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 29-5-23;

If a guardian is also appointed and if the guardian and conservator are not the same person, the reasonable sums or property to be furnished to the guardian to provide adequately for the ward’s support, care, education, health, and welfare, subject to modification by subsequent order of the court;

If the ward has an interest in real property, the name of the county in which the real property is located; and

Such other and further provisions of the conservatorship as the court shall determine to be in the best interest of the ward, stating the reasons therefor.

Service of the court’s order shall be made by first-class mail upon the ward, the ward’s legal counsel, the guardian ad litem, if any, the conservator, the petitioner, and other persons designated for service of the petition for conservatorship.

After service of an order granting a conservatorship, the ward’s legal counsel shall make reasonable efforts to explain to the ward the order of conservatorship and the ward’s rights under the order.

In any case involving the appointment of a conservator, if the ward has an interest in real property, the court shall file, within 30 days of granting the petition for conservatorship, a certificate with the clerk of the superior court of each county in this state in which the ward owns real property, to be recorded in the deed records of the county and indexed under the name of the ward in the grantor index. The certificate shall set forth the name of the ward, the expiration date of the conservatorship, if limited by court order, the date of the order granting the conservatorship, and the name of the conservator. The certificate shall be accompanied by the same fee required for filing deeds with the clerk of the superior court. The filing fee and any fee for the certificate shall be taxed as costs to the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-14.
Appointment of emergency conservator; requirements of petition.

Any interested person, including the proposed ward, may file a petition for the appointment of an emergency conservator. Such petition shall be filed in the court of the county in which:

The proposed ward is domiciled;

The proposed ward is found; or

Jurisdiction is otherwise proper under Code Section 29-11-12.

The petition for appointment of an emergency conservator shall set forth:

A statement of the facts upon which the court’s jurisdiction is based;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the proposed ward, if known;

The name, address, and county of domicile of the petitioner and the petitioner’s relationship to the proposed ward;

A statement of the reasons the emergency conservatorship is sought, including the facts which support the need for a conservator and the facts which establish an immediate and substantial risk of irreparable waste or dissipation of the proposed ward’s property unless an emergency conservator is appointed;

The reasons why compliance with the procedures of Code Sections 29-5-10 through 29-5-13 is not appropriate in the circumstances;

The fact that no other person appears to have authority and willingness to act in the circumstances, whether under a power of attorney, trust, or otherwise; and

The reason for any omission to the petition for appointment of emergency conservator in the event full particulars are lacking.

The petition shall state whether a petition for the appointment of a conservator or guardian has been filed or is being filed in conjunction with the petition for the appointment of an emergency conservator; and, if no other petition has been filed or is being filed, shall include a summary description of all known assets, income, other sources of funds, liabilities, and expenses of the proposed ward.

The petition shall be sworn to by two or more petitioners or shall be supported by an affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker or, if the proposed ward is a patient in any federal medical facility in which such a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker is not available, a physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker authorized to practice in that facility.

Any affidavit shall be based on personal knowledge and shall state that the affiant has examined the proposed ward within 15 days prior to the filing of the petition and that, based on the examination, the proposed ward was determined to lack sufficient capacity to make or communicate significant, responsible decisions concerning the management of the proposed ward’s property and that there is an immediate and substantial risk of irreparable waste or dissipation of the proposed ward’s property unless an emergency conservator is appointed.

In addition to stating the facts that support the need for an emergency conservator, the affidavit shall state the foreseeable duration of the emergency conservatorship and may set forth the affiant’s opinion as to any other limitations on the emergency conservatorship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 15/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: “Any interested person, including the proposed ward, may file a petition for the appointment of an emergency conservator. The petition shall be filed in the court of the county in which the proposed ward is domiciled or is found.”

29-5-15.
Review of petition; dismissal; requirements of court upon finding need for emergency conservator.

Upon the filing of a petition for an emergency conservatorship, the court shall review the petition and the affidavit, if any, to determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of an emergency conservator within the meaning of Code Section 29-5-14.

If the court determines that there is no probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of an emergency conservator, the court shall dismiss the petition and provide the proposed ward with a copy of the petition, the affidavit, if any, and the order dismissing the petition.

If the court determines that there is probable cause to believe that the proposed ward is in need of an emergency conservator, the court shall:

Immediately appoint legal counsel to represent the proposed ward at the emergency hearing, which counsel may be the same counsel who is appointed to represent the proposed ward in the hearing on the petition for guardianship or conservatorship, if any such petition has been filed, and shall inform counsel of the appointment;

Order an emergency hearing to be conducted not sooner than three days nor later than five days after the filing of the petition;

Order an evaluation of the proposed ward by a physician who shall be a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or a licensed clinical social worker, other than the physician, psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker who completed the affidavit attached to the petition pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-10, to be conducted within 72 hours and a written report to be furnished to the court and made available to the parties within 72 hours, which evaluation and report shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 29-5-14;

Immediately notify the proposed ward of the proceedings by service of all pleadings on the proposed ward, which notice shall:

Be served personally on the proposed ward by an officer of the court and shall not be served by mail;

Inform the proposed ward that a petition has been filed to have an emergency conservator appointed for the proposed ward, that the proposed ward has the right to attend any hearing that is held, and that, if an emergency conservator is appointed, the proposed ward may lose important rights to control the management of the proposed ward’s property;

Inform the proposed ward of the place and time at which the proposed ward shall submit to the evaluation provided for by paragraph (3) of this subsection;

Inform the proposed ward of the appointment of legal counsel; and

Inform the proposed ward of the date and time of the hearing on the emergency conservatorship; and

Appoint an emergency conservator to serve until the emergency hearing, with or without prior notice to the proposed ward, if the threatened risk is so immediate and the potential harm so irreparable that any delay is unreasonable and the existence of the threatened risk and potential for irreparable harm is certified by the affidavit of a physician licensed to practice medicine under Chapter 34 of Title 43, a psychologist licensed to practice under Chapter 39 of Title 43, or licensed clinical social worker; provided, however, that, pending the emergency hearing, the court shall order that no withdrawals may be made from any account on the authority of the proposed ward’s signature without the court’s prior approval and that the emergency conservator shall not expend any funds of the proposed ward without prior court approval. Appointment of an emergency conservator under this paragraph is not a final determination of the proposed ward’s need for a nonemergency conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 13/SB 534.

29-5-16.
Emergency conservatorship hearing; limitations on powers of emergency conservator.

The court shall conduct the emergency conservatorship hearing at the time and date set forth in its order to determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence of the need for an emergency conservatorship in light of the evidence taken at the hearing. In addition to the evidence at the hearing, the court may consider the evaluation report and any response filed by the proposed ward. The burden of proof shall be upon the petitioner. Upon the consent of the petitioner and the proposed ward, the court may grant a continuance of the case for a period not to exceed 30 days.

If the court at the emergency hearing finds that an emergency conservatorship is necessary, the court shall order the emergency conservatorship; provided, however, that:

Any emergency conservator shall have only those powers and duties specifically enumerated in the letters of emergency conservatorship and the powers and duties shall not exceed those absolutely necessary to respond to the immediate threatened risk to the ward;

The court may order the emergency conservator to make any report the court requires; and

The emergency conservatorship shall terminate on the earliest of:

The court’s removal of the emergency conservator, with or without cause;

The effective date of the appointment of a conservator;

Unless otherwise specified in the order of dismissal, the dismissal of a petition for appointment of a conservator;

The date specified for the termination in the order appointing the emergency conservator; or

Sixty days from the date of appointment of the emergency conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-17.
[Repealed] Responsibility for paying expenses of any hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 14/SB 534; repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 16/HB 70, effective January 1, 2020.